North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 14. Inspection Service Fees.

§§ 95-105,
95-106.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-427, s. 11(a) and (b), effective July 1, 2003.

Section Repealed upon Adoption of Rule.

Session Laws 2001-427, s. 11(a) and (b), repealed

G.S. 95-105

and G.S. 95-106. Session Laws 2001-427, s. 11(g), provides that the repeal of these sections by s. 11(a) and (b) becomes effective upon the effective date of a rule adopted pursuant to

G.S. 95-110.5(20)

, as enacted by s. 11(e) of the act. Effective July 1, 2003, the North Carolina Department of Labor adopted a permanent rule regarding the fees that had been governed by

G.S. 95-105

and G.S. 95-106. As a result, these sections stand repealed, effective July 1, 2003.

§ 95-107.
Assessment and collection of fees; certificates of safe operation.

The assessment of the fees adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to

G.S. 95-69.11

, 95-110.5, 95-111.4 and 95-120 shall be made against the owner or operator of the equipment and may be collected at the time of inspection. If the fees are not collected at the time of inspection, the Department must bill the owner or operator of the equipment for the amount of the fee assessed for the inspection of the equipment and the amount assessed is payable by the owner or operator of the equipment upon receipt of the bill. Certificates of safe operation may be withheld by the Department of Labor until such time as the assessed fees are collected.

History.

1975, c. 777, s. 3; 1995, c. 217, s. 1; 2001-427, s. 11(c); 2005-347, s. 6; 2005-453, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-347, s. 6, effective September 7, 2005, substituted “G.S. 95-110.5, 95-111.4, and 95-120” for “G.S. 95-110.5 and

G.S. 95-111.4

.”

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 13, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “G.S. 95-69.11, 95-110.5, and 95-111.4” for “G.S. 95-110.5 and

G.S. 95-111.4

” in the first sentence.

§ 95-108.
Disposition of fees.

All fees collected by the Department of Labor pursuant to

G.S. 95-69.11

, 95-110.5, 95-111.4 and 95-120 shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and shall be used exclusively for inspection and certification purposes.

History.

1975, c. 777, s. 4; 2001-427, s. 11(d); 2005-347, s. 7; 2005-453, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-347, s. 7, effective September 7, 2005, substituted “G.S. 95-110.5, 95-111.4, and 95-120” for “G.S. 95-110.5 and

G.S. 95-111.4

.”

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 14, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “G.S. 95-69.11, 95-110.5, and 95-111.4” for “G.S. 95-110.5, and

G.S. 95-111.4

.”

§ 95-109.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 990, s. 3.

§ 95-110.

Reserved for future codification purposes.